Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1603
University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources; accreditation.

Every person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, association, or corporation subject to the provisions of sections 54-1601 to 54-1605 shall observe, perform, and comply with all rules, regulations, and requirements fixed, established, or specified by the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources or its designated agents as to what SPF swine raised or to be raised in Nebraska shall be eligible for accreditation as provided by such sections as to standards, requirements, and forms of and for accreditation under such sections. No accreditation within the provisions of such sections shall be made or authorized except by or through the institute or its designated agents.

Laws 1967, c. 338, § 3, p. 906;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 39;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 71.